Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1859
Enlargement or extension of area; applicability of sections.

Sections 66-1858 to 66-1864 shall be applicable to a jurisdictional utility only when it is operating in a county in which there is located the natural gas service area, or portion of the natural gas service area, of a metropolitan utilities district and only with regard to matters arising within any such county. Within the limits of a municipal county, the provisions of sections 66-1858 to 66-1864 shall be applicable to the extent and in the manner provided by the Legislature as required by section 13-2802.

Laws 1999, LB 78, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 52;

R.S.1943, (2004), § 57-1302;

Laws 2006, LB 1249, § 6.